District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.121

Repealed

Fees and charges.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 228, ch. 269, § 121
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 85-254, § 30
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 139, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(9)
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title VII, §§ 701-705, 23 DCR 2461
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 102, 31 DCR 3974
June 7, 1989, D.C. Law 8-5, § 2, 36 DCR 2654
June 16, 1989, D.C. Law 8-12, § 2, 36 DCR 3371
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(uu), (vv), 39 DCR 4863
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-39, § 2(d), 42 DCR 3273
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-185, § 2(d), 43 DCR 4510
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1603(b), 49 DCR 11664
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2042, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2024, 57 DCR 6242
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.121.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.22.
1973 Ed., § 29-936.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-150, July 20, 1996, law notification 44 DCR 2863).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 204 of the Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Temporary Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-222, September 24, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 9859).
For temporary suspension of all references in section to 5-year reporting, filing, or payment of fees requirements until after December 31, 1996, at which time the 1-year or annual requirements shall be in effect and the annual report fee shall be $100, see § 2(c) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Report Suspension Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-247, April 11, 1996, 43 DCR 2125).
For temporary suspension of the 5-year reporting provision, see § 2(c) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-307, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4208).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1603(b) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1603(b) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1603(b) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2042 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2042 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2024 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
Preparation and payment of appropriate taxes: Section 2(i) of D.C. Law 11-185 provides that nothing in the act shall be construed or interpreted as repealing or affecting any requirement of a domestic or foreign corporation to prepare and submit annual tax forms, or to pay any appropriate District or federal taxes, as provided in accordance with the laws of the District of Columbia or the United States.